Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-571
Council; officers; advisory committees; meetings; expenses.

(1) The Geographic Information Systems Council shall elect a chairperson from its members and such other officers as the council deems necessary.

(2) As the need arises, advisory committees may be established by the council from various levels of government, industry, or the general public to assist the council. The members of advisory committees shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

(3) The council shall meet quarterly or upon the call of the chairperson.

Laws 1991, LB 639, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 238, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 81-2603;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 341;

Laws 2008, LB823, § 19;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 144.